tests/sk.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] Base forms in ск":
    Минск<np><top><nom> : Минск
    Буйнакск<np><top><nom> : Буйнакск

  "[twol] Inflected forms in ски":
    Минск<np><top><loc> : Минскиде
    Буйнакск<np><top><abl> : Буйнакскиден
